Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-710.14
Sickness and accident insurance; falsity of application; effect.

The falsity of any statement in the application for any policy of sickness and accident insurance covered by sections 44-709 to 44-767 may not bar the right to recovery thereunder unless such false statement materially affected either the acceptance of the risk or the hazard assumed by the insurer.

Laws 1957, c. 188, § 15, p. 658;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 144.

This section must be read in pari materia with section 44-358. Farm Bureau Life Ins. Co. v. Luebbe, 218 Neb. 694, 358 N.W.2d 754 (1984); White v. Medico Life Ins. Co., 212 Neb. 901, 327 N.W.2d 606 (1982).

This section should be construed with section 44-358 in determining whether policy risk is avoided. Zimmerman v. Continental Cas. Co., 181 Neb. 654, 150 N.W.2d 268 (1967).

Where insured made no false statements in application, recovery was not barred by this section. Corrigan v. Fireman's Fund Ins. Co., 180 Neb. 13, 141 N.W.2d 170 (1966).